Missouri, session 2026, SB1352.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 578.012, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 578.012,
to read as follows:
578.012. 1. A person commits the offense of animal
abuse if he or she:
(1) Intentionally or purposely kills an animal in any
manner not allowed by or expressly exempted from the
provisions of sections 578.005 to 578.023 and 273.030;
(2) Purposely or intentionally causes injury or
suffering to an animal; or
(3) Having ownership or custody of an animal knowingly
fails to provide adequate care which results in substantial
harm to the animal.
2. Animal abuse is a class A misdemeanor, unless the
defendant has previously been found guilty of animal abuse
[or], the suffering involved in subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of this section is the result of torture or
mutilation [consciously] inflicted while the animal was
alive, or the harm involved in subdivision (3) of subsection
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1352 2
1 of this section is the result of starvation, in which case
it is a class E felony.
✓